Tennessee, session 114, HB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-406, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) Each December 7, any flag flown over the state capitol building must be
flown at half-staff from sunrise to sunset in observance of Pearl Harbor Remembrance
Day.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1463
010595
- 1 -